Nevada, session 83, SB454.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Section 5 of chapter 336, Statutes of Nevada 2021,
at page 1998, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5. 1. This section and sections 1 to 4, inclusive,
and 4.7 of this act become effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 4.5 of this act becomes effective on July 1,
2021, and expires by limitation on June 30, [2026.] 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)